test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_anneed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - anneeđ: # MLO checked
    anneeđ+V+Inf: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anam
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: anah
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ana
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: anneen
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: anevettee
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: anneev
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: anneep
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: anevetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aneh
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oonnim
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oonnih
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oonij
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oonijm
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oonijd
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oonijn
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oonijm
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oonijd
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: onnii
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: anaččim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: anaččih
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: anaččij
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: anaččáim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: anaččáid
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: anaččáin
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: anaččijm
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: anaččijd
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: anaččii
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: aaneem
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: aaneeh
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ooniš
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: onižeen
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: oonišvettee
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: onižává
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: onižep
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: oonišvetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: onižeh

    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ane
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: anos
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: annoon
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: annee
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: annoos
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: annoop
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: annoos
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ane
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: annaam
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: anaččii
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: aanaa
    anneeđ+V+PrsPrc: annee
    anneeđ+V+PrfPrc: annaam
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Nom: anneem
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ess: anemin
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Loc: anemist
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ill: anemân
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Com: anedijn
    anneeđ+V+VAbess: anehánnáá


  Verb - jotteeđ: # MLO checked
    jotteeđ+V+Inf: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođám
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jođáh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jotá
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jotteen
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: jotevettee
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: jotteev
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jotteep
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jotevetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joteh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juuttim
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juuttih
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juuđij
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: juuđijm
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: juuđijd
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: juuđijn
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juuđijm
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juuđijd
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juttii
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: jođáččim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: jođáččih
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: jođáččij
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: jođáččáim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: jođáččáid
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: jođáččáin
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: jođáččijm
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: jođáččijd
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: jođáččii
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: joođeem
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: joođeeh
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: juuđiš
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: juđižeen
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: juuđišvettee
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: juđižává
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: juđižep
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: juuđišvetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: juđižeh

    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: jođe
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: jođos
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: jottoon
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: jottee
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: jottoos
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: jottoop
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: jottoos
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: jođe
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: jottáám
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: jođáččii
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: joođáá
    jotteeđ+V+PrsPrc: jottee
    jotteeđ+V+PrfPrc: jottáám
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Nom: jotteem
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ess: jotemin
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Loc: jotemist
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ill: jotemân
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Com: jođedijn
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jođehánnáá
